Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 2. COMPETITION AND TRADE PRACTICES

CHAPTER 20. REGULATION OF CONSUMER CREDIT REPORTING AGENCIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 20.01. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Adverse action" includes:

(A) the denial of, increase in a charge for, or reduction in the amount of insurance for personal, family, or household purposes;

(B) the denial of employment or other decision made for employment purposes that adversely affects a current or prospective employee; or

(C) an action or determination with respect to a consumer's application for credit that is adverse to the consumer's interests.

(2) "Consumer" means an individual who resides in this state.

(3) "Consumer file" means all of the information about a consumer that is recorded and retained by a consumer reporting agency regardless of how the information is stored.

(4) "Consumer report" means a communication or other information by a consumer reporting agency relating to the credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, debts, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living of a consumer that is used or expected to be used or collected, wholly or partly, as a factor in establishing the consumer's eligibility for credit or insurance for personal, family, or household purposes, employment purposes, or other purpose authorized under Sections 603 and 604 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sections 1681a and 1681b), as amended. The term does not include:

(A) a report containing information solely on a transaction between the consumer and the person making the report;

(B) an authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device;

(C) a report in which a person who has been requested by a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to a consumer makes a decision with respect to the request, if the third party advises the consumer of the name and address of the person to whom the request was made and the person makes the disclosures that must be made under Section 615 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681m), as amended, to the consumer in the event of adverse action against the consumer;

(D) any communication of information described in this subdivision among persons related by common ownership or affiliated by corporate control; or

(E) any communication of other information among persons related by common ownership or affiliated by corporate control, if it is clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the consumer that the information may be communicated among such persons and the consumer is given the opportunity before the time that the information is initially communicated to direct that such information not be communicated among such persons.

(5) "Consumer reporting agency" means a person that regularly engages wholly or partly in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers to furnish consumer reports to third parties for monetary fees, for dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis. The term does not include a business entity that provides only check verification or check guarantee services.

(6) "Investigative consumer report" means all or part of a consumer report in which information on the character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living of a consumer is obtained through a personal interview with a neighbor, friend, or associate of the consumer or others with whom the consumer is acquainted or who may have knowledge concerning any such information. The term does not include specific factual information on a consumer's credit record obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer or from a consumer reporting agency when the information was obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer or from the consumer.

(7) "Security alert" means a notice placed on a consumer file that alerts a recipient of a consumer report involving that consumer file that the consumer's identity may have been used without the consumer's consent to fraudulently obtain goods or services in the consumer's name.

(8) "Security freeze" means a notice placed on a consumer file that prohibits a consumer reporting agency from releasing a consumer report relating to the extension of credit involving that consumer file without the express authorization of the consumer.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.02. PERMISSIBLE PURPOSES; PROHIBITION; USE OF CONSUMER'S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER. (a) A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report only:

(1) in response to a court order issued by a court with proper jurisdiction;

(2) in accordance with the written instructions of the consumer to whom the report relates; or

(3) to a person the agency has reason to believe:

(A) intends to use the information in connection with a transaction involving the extension of credit to, or review or collection of an account of, the consumer to whom the report relates;

(B) intends to use the information for employment purposes as authorized under the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended, and regulations adopted under that Act;

(C) intends to use the information in connection with the underwriting of insurance involving the consumer as authorized under the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended, and regulations adopted under that Act;

(D) intends to use the information in connection with a determination of the consumer's eligibility for a license or other benefit granted by a governmental entity required by law to consider an applicant's financial responsibility or status;

(E) has a legitimate business need for the information in connection with a business transaction involving the consumer; or

(F) intends to use the information for any purpose authorized under the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended, and regulations adopted under that Act.

(b) A consumer reporting agency may not prohibit a user of a consumer report or investigative consumer report from disclosing the contents of the report or providing a copy of the report to the consumer to whom it relates at the consumer's request if adverse action against the consumer based wholly or partly on the report has been taken or is contemplated by the user of the report. A user of a consumer report or a consumer reporting agency may not be found liable or otherwise held responsible for a disclosed or copied report when acting under this subsection. The disclosure or copy of the report, by itself, does not make a user of the report a consumer reporting agency.

(c) If a consumer furnishes the consumer's social security number to a person for use in obtaining a consumer report, the person shall include the consumer's social security number with the request for the consumer report and shall include the social security number with all future reports of information regarding the consumer made by the person to a consumer reporting agency unless the person has reason to believe that the social security number is inaccurate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.021. CHECK VERIFICATION AND CHECK GUARANTEE SERVICES; DISCLOSURES TO CONSUMERS. (a) In this section, "check verifier" means any business offering check verification or check guarantee services in this state.

(b) On request and proper identification provided by a consumer, a check verifier shall disclose to the consumer in writing all information pertaining to the consumer in the check verifier's files at the time of the request, including:

(1) the criteria used by the check verifier to reject a check from the consumer;

(2) a set of instructions describing how information is presented on the check verifier's written disclosure of the consumer file; and

(3) a toll-free number at which personnel are available to consumers during normal business hours for use in resolving a dispute if the consumer submits a written dispute to the check verifier.

(c) A check verifier may not charge a consumer for disclosing the information required under Subsection (b) if the check verifier has rejected a check from the consumer in the 30 days prior to the consumer's request for information. A check verifier may otherwise impose a reasonable charge on a consumer for the disclosure of information pertaining to the consumer in an amount not to exceed $8.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1291, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Renumbered from Business and Commerce Code, Section 20.11 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(2), eff. September 1, 2005.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.03. DISCLOSURES TO CONSUMERS. (a) On request and proper identification provided by a consumer, a consumer reporting agency shall disclose to the consumer in writing all information pertaining to the consumer in the consumer reporting agency's files at the time of the request, including:

(1) the name of each person requesting credit information about the consumer during the preceding six months and the date of each request;

(2) a set of instructions describing how information is presented on the consumer reporting agency's written disclosure of the consumer file; and

(3) if the consumer reporting agency compiles and maintains files on a nationwide basis, a toll-free number at which personnel are available to consumers during normal business hours for use in resolving a dispute if the consumer submits a written dispute to the consumer reporting agency.

(b) The information must be disclosed in a clear, accurate manner that is understandable to a consumer.

(c) A consumer reporting agency shall provide a copy of the consumer's file to the consumer on the request of the consumer and on evidence of proper identification, as directed by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended, and regulations adopted under that Act.

(d) Any written disclosure to a consumer by a consumer reporting agency under this chapter must include a written statement that explains in clear and simple language the consumer's rights under this chapter and includes:

(1) the process for receiving a consumer report or consumer file;

(2) the process for requesting or removing a security alert or freeze;

(3) the toll-free telephone number for requesting a security alert;

(4) applicable fees;

(5) dispute procedures;

(6) the process for correcting a consumer file or report; and

(7) information on a consumer's right to bring an action in court or arbitrate a dispute.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. SECURITY ALERT AND SECURITY FREEZE

Sec. 20.031. REQUESTING SECURITY ALERT. On a request in writing or by telephone and with proper identification provided by a consumer, a consumer reporting agency shall place a security alert on the consumer's consumer file not later than 24 hours after the date the agency receives the request. The security alert must remain in effect for not less than 45 days after the date the agency places the security alert on the file. There is no limit on the number of security alerts a consumer may request. At the end of a 45-day security alert, on request in writing or by telephone and with proper identification provided by the consumer, the agency shall provide the consumer with a copy of the consumer's file. A consumer may include with the security alert request a telephone number to be used by persons to verify the consumer's identity before entering into a transaction with the consumer.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.032. NOTIFICATION OF SECURITY ALERT. A consumer reporting agency shall notify a person who requests a consumer report if a security alert is in effect for the consumer file involved in that report and include a verification telephone number for the consumer if the consumer has provided a number under Section 20.031.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.033. TOLL-FREE SECURITY ALERT REQUEST NUMBER. A consumer reporting agency shall maintain a toll-free telephone number that is answered at a minimum during normal business hours to accept security alert requests from consumers. If calls are not answered after normal business hours, an automated answering system shall record requests and calls shall be returned to the consumer not later than two hours after the time the normal business day begins on the next business day after the date the call was received.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.034. REQUESTING SECURITY FREEZE. (a) On written request sent by certified mail that includes proper identification provided by a consumer, a consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a consumer's consumer file not later than the fifth business day after the date the agency receives the request.

(b) On written request for a security freeze provided by a consumer under Subsection (a), a consumer reporting agency shall disclose to the consumer the process of placing, removing, and temporarily lifting a security freeze and the process for allowing access to information from the consumer's consumer file for a specific requester or period while the security freeze is in effect.

(c) A consumer reporting agency shall, not later than the 10th business day after the date the agency receives the request for a security freeze:

(1) send a written confirmation of the security freeze to the consumer; and

(2) provide the consumer with a unique personal identification number or password to be used by the consumer to authorize a removal or temporary lifting of the security freeze under Section 20.037.

(d) A consumer may request in writing a replacement personal identification number or password. The request must comply with the requirements for requesting a security freeze under Subsection (a). The consumer reporting agency shall not later than the third business day after the date the agency receives the request for a replacement personal identification number or password provide the consumer with a new unique personal identification number or password to be used by the consumer instead of the number or password that was provided under Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 222), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.035. NOTIFICATION OF CHANGE. If a security freeze is in place, a consumer reporting agency shall notify the consumer in writing of a change in the consumer file to the consumer's name, date of birth, social security number, or address not later than 30 calendar days after the date the change is made. The agency shall send notification of a change of address to the new address and former address. This section does not require notice of an immaterial change, including a street abbreviation change or correction of a transposition of letters or misspelling of a word.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.036. NOTIFICATION OF SECURITY FREEZE. A consumer reporting agency shall notify a person who requests a consumer report if a security freeze is in effect for the consumer file involved in that report.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.037. REMOVAL OR TEMPORARY LIFTING OF SECURITY FREEZE. (a) On a request in writing or by telephone and with proper identification provided by a consumer, including the consumer's personal identification number or password provided under Section 20.034, a consumer reporting agency shall remove a security freeze not later than the third business day after the date the agency receives the request.

(b) On a request in writing or by telephone and with proper identification provided by a consumer, including the consumer's personal identification number or password provided under Section 20.034, a consumer reporting agency, not later than the third business day after the date the agency receives the request, shall temporarily lift the security freeze for:

(1) a certain properly designated period; or

(2) a certain properly identified requester.

(c) A consumer reporting agency may develop procedures involving the use of a telephone, a facsimile machine, the Internet, or another electronic medium to receive and process a request from a consumer under this section.

(d) A consumer reporting agency shall remove a security freeze placed on a consumer file if the security freeze was placed due to a material misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. The consumer reporting agency shall notify the consumer in writing before removing the security freeze under this subsection.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143, Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 222), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 20.038. EXEMPTION FROM SECURITY FREEZE. A security freeze does not apply to a consumer report provided to:

(1) a state or local governmental entity, including a law enforcement agency or court or private collection agency, if the entity, agency, or court is acting under a court order, warrant, subpoena, or administrative subpoena;

(2) a child support agency as defined by Section 101.004, Family Code, acting to investigate or collect child support payments or acting under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 651 et seq.);

(3) the Health and Human Services Commission acting under Section 531.102, Government Code;

(4) the comptroller acting to investigate or collect delinquent sales or franchise taxes;

(5) a tax assessor-collector acting to investigate or collect delinquent ad valorem taxes;

(6) a person for the purposes of prescreening as provided by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended;

(7) a person with whom the consumer has an account or contract or to whom the consumer has issued a negotiable instrument, or the person's subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, prospective assignee, or private collection agency, for purposes related to that account, contract, or instrument;

(8) a subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under Section 20.037(b);

(9) a person who administers a credit file monitoring subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed;

(10) a person for the purpose of providing a consumer with a copy of the consumer's report on the consumer's request;

(11) a check service or fraud prevention service company that issues consumer reports:

(A) to prevent or investigate fraud; or

(B) for purposes of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds transfers, or similar methods of payment;

(12) a deposit account information service company that issues consumer reports related to account closures caused by fraud, substantial overdrafts, automated teller machine abuses, or similar negative information regarding a consumer to an inquiring financial institution for use by the financial institution only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account with that institution; or

(13) a consumer reporting agency that:

(A) acts only to resell credit information by assembling and merging information contained in a database of another consumer reporting agency or multiple consumer reporting agencies; and

(B) does not maintain a permanent database of credit information from which new consumer reports are produced.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 20.038. EXEMPTION FROM SECURITY FREEZE. A security freeze does not apply to a consumer report provided to:

(1) a state or local governmental entity, including a law enforcement agency or court or private collection agency, if the entity, agency, or court is acting under a court order, warrant, subpoena, or administrative subpoena;

(2) a child support agency as defined by Section 101.004, Family Code, acting to investigate or collect child support payments or acting under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 651 et seq.);

(3) the Health and Human Services Commission acting under the following provisions of the Government Code:

(A) Section 544.0052;

(B) Section 544.0101;

(C) Section 544.0102;

(D) Section 544.0103;

(E) Section 544.0104;

(F) Section 544.0105;

(G) Section 544.0106;

(H) Section 544.0108;

(I) Sections 544.0109(b) and (d);

(J) Section 544.0110;

(K) Section 544.0113;

(L) Section 544.0114;

(M) Section 544.0251;

(N) Section 544.0252(b);

(O) Section 544.0254;

(P) Section 544.0255;

(Q) Section 544.0257;

(R) Section 544.0301;

(S) Section 544.0302;

(T) Section 544.0303; and

(U) Section 544.0304;

(4) the comptroller acting to investigate or collect delinquent sales or franchise taxes;

(5) a tax assessor-collector acting to investigate or collect delinquent ad valorem taxes;

(6) a person for the purposes of prescreening as provided by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended;

(7) a person with whom the consumer has an account or contract or to whom the consumer has issued a negotiable instrument, or the person's subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, prospective assignee, or private collection agency, for purposes related to that account, contract, or instrument;

(8) a subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under Section 20.037(b);

(9) a person who administers a credit file monitoring subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed;

(10) a person for the purpose of providing a consumer with a copy of the consumer's report on the consumer's request;

(11) a check service or fraud prevention service company that issues consumer reports:

(A) to prevent or investigate fraud; or

(B) for purposes of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds transfers, or similar methods of payment;

(12) a deposit account information service company that issues consumer reports related to account closures caused by fraud, substantial overdrafts, automated teller machine abuses, or similar negative information regarding a consumer to an inquiring financial institution for use by the financial institution only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account with that institution; or

(13) a consumer reporting agency that:

(A) acts only to resell credit information by assembling and merging information contained in a database of another consumer reporting agency or multiple consumer reporting agencies; and

(B) does not maintain a permanent database of credit information from which new consumer reports are produced.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 20.0385. APPLICABILITY OF SECURITY ALERT AND SECURITY FREEZE. (a) The requirement under this chapter to place a security alert or security freeze on a consumer file does not apply to:

(1) a check service or fraud prevention service company that issues consumer reports:

(A) to prevent or investigate fraud; or

(B) for purposes of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds transfers, or similar methods of payment; or

(2) a deposit account information service company that issues consumer reports related to account closures caused by fraud, substantial overdrafts, automated teller machine abuses, or similar negative information regarding a consumer to an inquiring financial institution for use by the financial institution only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account with that institution.

(b) The requirement under this chapter to place a security freeze on a consumer file does not apply to a consumer reporting agency that:

(1) acts only to resell credit information by assembling and merging information contained in a database of another consumer reporting agency or multiple consumer reporting agencies; and

(2) does not maintain a permanent database of credit information from which new consumer reports are produced.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 20.12, a violation of a requirement under this chapter to place, temporarily lift, or remove a security freeze on a consumer file is not a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice under Subchapter E, Chapter 17.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 222), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.039. RESPECT OF SECURITY FREEZE. A consumer reporting agency shall honor a security freeze placed on a consumer file by another consumer reporting agency.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER C. RESTRICTIONS ON AND AUTHORITY OF CONSUMERS AND CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCIES

Sec. 20.04. CHARGES FOR CERTAIN DISCLOSURES OR SERVICES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a consumer reporting agency may impose a reasonable charge on a consumer for the disclosure of information pertaining to the consumer or for placing a security freeze on a consumer file, temporarily lifting a security freeze for a designated period or for an identified requester, or removing a security freeze in accordance with this chapter. The amount of the charge for the disclosure of information pertaining to the consumer may not exceed $8. The amount of the charge for placing a security freeze on a consumer file, temporarily lifting a security freeze for a designated period, or removing a security freeze may not exceed $10 per request. The amount of the charge for temporarily lifting a security freeze for an identified requester may not exceed $12 per request. On January 1 of each year, a consumer reporting agency may increase the charge for disclosure to a consumer or for placing, temporarily lifting, or removing a security freeze. The increase, if any, must be based proportionally on changes to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers as determined by the United States Department of Labor with fractional changes rounded to the nearest 50 cents.

(b) A consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for:

(1) a request by a consumer for a copy of the consumer's file:

(A) made not later than the 60th day after the date on which adverse action is taken against the consumer; or

(B) made on the expiration of a 45-day security alert;

(2) notification of the deletion of information that is found to be inaccurate or can no longer be verified sent to a person designated by the consumer, as prescribed by Section 611 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681i), as amended;

(3) a set of instructions for understanding the information presented on the consumer report;

(4) a toll-free telephone number that consumers may call to obtain additional assistance concerning the consumer report or to request a security alert;

(5) a request for a security alert made by a consumer; or

(6) the placement, temporary lifting, or removal of a security freeze at the request of a consumer who has submitted to the consumer reporting agency a copy of a valid police report, investigative report, or complaint involving the alleged commission of an offense under Section 32.51, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1143 (S.B. 222), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.05. REPORTING OF INFORMATION PROHIBITED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a consumer reporting agency may not furnish a consumer report containing information related to:

(1) a case under Title 11 of the United States Code or under the federal Bankruptcy Act in which the date of entry of the order for relief or the date of adjudication predates the consumer report by more than 10 years;

(2) a suit or judgment in which the date of entry predates the consumer report by more than seven years or the governing statute of limitations, whichever is longer;

(3) a tax lien in which the date of payment predates the consumer report by more than seven years;

(4) a record of arrest, indictment, or conviction of a crime in which the date of disposition, release, or parole predates the consumer report by more than seven years;

(5) a collection account with a medical industry code, if the consumer was covered by a health benefit plan at the time of the event giving rise to the collection and the collection is for an outstanding balance, after copayments, deductibles, and coinsurance, owed to an emergency care provider or a facility-based provider for an out-of-network benefit claim; or

(6) another item or event that predates the consumer report by more than seven years.

(b) A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report that contains information described by Subsection (a) if the information is provided in connection with:

(1) a credit transaction with a principal amount that is or may reasonably be expected to be $150,000 or more;

(2) the underwriting of life insurance for a face amount that is or may reasonably be expected to be $150,000 or more; or

(3) the employment of a consumer at an annual salary that is or may reasonably be expected to be $75,000 or more.

(b-1) A consumer reporting agency may furnish to a person a consumer report that contains information described by Subsection (a) if the information is needed by the person to avoid a violation of 18 U.S.C. Section 1033.

(c) A consumer reporting agency may not furnish medical information about a consumer in a consumer report that is being obtained for employment purposes or in connection with a credit, insurance, or direct marketing transaction unless the consumer consents to the furnishing of the medical information.

(d) In this section:

(1) "Emergency care provider" means a physician, health care practitioner, facility, or other health care provider who provides emergency care.

(2) "Facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 324.001, Health and Safety Code.

(3) "Facility-based provider" means a physician, health care practitioner, or other health care provider who provides health care or medical services to patients of a facility.

(4) "Health care practitioner" means an individual who is licensed to provide health care services.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 599 (H.B. 1893), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 340 (S.B. 1037), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2019.

Sec. 20.06. DISPUTE PROCEDURE. (a) If the completeness or accuracy of information contained in a consumer's file is disputed by the consumer and the consumer notifies the consumer reporting agency of the dispute, the agency shall reinvestigate the disputed information free of charge and record the current status of the disputed information not later than the 30th business day after the date on which the agency receives the notice. The consumer reporting agency shall provide the consumer with the option of notifying the agency of a dispute concerning the consumer's file by speaking directly to a representative of the agency during normal business hours.

(b) Not later than the fifth business day after the date on which a consumer reporting agency receives notice of a dispute from a consumer in accordance with Subsection (a), the agency shall provide notice of the dispute to each person who provided any information related to the dispute.

(c) A consumer reporting agency may terminate a reinvestigation of information disputed by a consumer under Subsection (a) if the agency reasonably determines that the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant. An agency that terminates a reinvestigation of disputed information under this subsection shall promptly notify the consumer of the termination and the reasons for the termination by mail, or if authorized by the consumer, by telephone. The presence of contradictory information in a consumer's file does not by itself constitute reasonable grounds for determining that the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant.

(d) If disputed information is found to be inaccurate or cannot be verified after a reinvestigation under Subsection (a), the consumer reporting agency, unless otherwise directed by the consumer, shall promptly delete the information from the consumer's file, revise the consumer file, and provide the revised consumer report to the consumer and to each person who requested the consumer report within the preceding six months. The consumer reporting agency may not report the inaccurate or unverified information in subsequent reports.

(e) Information deleted under Subsection (d) may not be reinserted in the consumer's file unless the person who furnishes the information to the consumer reporting agency reinvestigates and states in writing or by electronic record to the agency that the information is complete and accurate.

(f) A consumer reporting agency shall provide written notice of the results of a reinvestigation or reinsertion made under this section not later than the fifth business day after the date on which the reinvestigation or reinsertion has been completed. The notice must include:

(1) a statement that the reinvestigation is complete;

(2) a statement of the determination made by the agency on the completeness or accuracy of the disputed information;

(3) a copy of the consumer's file or consumer report and a description of the results of the reinvestigation;

(4) a statement that a description of the procedure used to determine the accuracy and completeness of the information shall be provided to the consumer by the agency on request, including the name, business address, and, if available, the telephone number of each person contacted in connection with the information;

(5) a statement that the consumer is entitled to add a statement to the consumer's file disputing the accuracy or completeness of the information as provided by Section 611 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681i), as amended; and

(6) a statement that the consumer may be entitled to dispute resolution as prescribed by this section, after the consumer receives the notice specified under this subsection.

(g) This section does not require a person who obtains a consumer report for resale to another person to alter or correct an inaccuracy in the consumer report if the report was not assembled or prepared by the person.

(h) This section applies to a business offering check verification or check guarantee services in this state.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 851, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1291, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.07. CORRECTION OF INACCURATE INFORMATION. (a) A consumer reporting agency shall provide a person who provides consumer credit information to the agency with the option of correcting previously reported inaccurate information by submitting the correction by facsimile or other automated means.

(b) The credit reporting agency which receives a correction shall have reasonable procedures to assure that previously reported inaccurate information in a consumer's file is corrected in a prompt and timely fashion.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER D. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 20.08. CONSUMER'S RIGHT TO FILE ACTION IN COURT OR ARBITRATE DISPUTES. (a) An action to enforce an obligation of a consumer reporting agency to a consumer under this chapter may be brought in any court as provided by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Section 1681 et seq.), as amended, or, if agreed to by both parties, may be submitted to binding arbitration after the consumer has followed all dispute procedures in Section 20.06 and has received the notice specified in Section 20.06(f) in the manner provided by the rules of the American Arbitration Association.

(b) A decision rendered by an arbitrator under this section does not affect the validity of an obligation or debt owed by the consumer to any party.

(c) A prevailing party in an action or arbitration proceeding brought under this section shall be compensated for the party's attorney fees and costs of the proceeding as determined by the court or arbitration.

(d) A consumer may not submit to arbitration more than one action against a particular consumer reporting agency during any 120-day period.

(e) The results of an arbitration action brought against a consumer reporting agency doing business in this state shall be communicated in a timely manner to other consumer reporting agencies doing business in this state.

(f) If a determination is made in favor of a consumer after submission of a dispute to arbitration, the disputed adverse information in the consumer's file or record shall be removed or stricken in a timely manner. If the adverse information is not removed or stricken, the consumer may bring an action against the noncomplying agency under this section regardless of the 120-day waiting period required under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.09. CIVIL LIABILITY. (a) A consumer reporting agency that wilfully violates this chapter is liable to the consumer against whom the violation occurs for the greater of three times the amount of actual damages to the consumer or $1,000, reasonable attorney fees, and court or arbitration costs.

(b) A consumer reporting agency that negligently violates this chapter is liable to the consumer against whom the violation occurs for the greater of the amount of actual damages to the consumer or $500, reasonable attorney fees, and court or arbitration costs. A consumer reporting agency is not considered to have negligently violated this chapter if, not later than the 30th day after the date on which the agency receives notice of a dispute from the consumer under Section 20.06 that clearly explains the nature and substance of the dispute, the agency completes the reinvestigation and sends the consumer and, at the request of the consumer, each person who received the consumer information written notification of the results of the reinvestigation in accordance with Section 20.06(f).

(c) In addition to liability imposed under Subsection (a), a consumer reporting agency that does not correct a consumer's file and consumer report before the 10th day after the date on which a judgment is entered against the agency because of inaccurate information contained in a consumer's file is also liable for $1,000 a day until the inaccuracy is corrected.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.10. REMEDIES CUMULATIVE. An action taken under this chapter does not prohibit a consumer from taking any other action authorized by law except that a credit reporting agency may not be subject to suit with respect to any issue that was the subject of an arbitration proceeding brought under Section 20.08.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1396, Sec. 33(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1997.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.11. INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; CIVIL PENALTY. (a) The attorney general may file a suit against a person for:

(1) injunctive relief to prevent or restrain a violation of this chapter; or

(2) a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $2,000 for each violation of this chapter.

(b) If the attorney general brings an action against a person under Subsection (a) and an injunction is granted against the person or the person is found liable for a civil penalty, the attorney general may recover reasonable expenses, court costs, investigative costs, and attorney's fees.

(c) Each day a violation continues or occurs is a separate violation for purposes of imposing a penalty under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.12. DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE. A violation of this chapter is a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice under Subchapter E, Chapter 17.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.13. VENUE. An action brought under this chapter shall be filed in a district court:

(1) in Travis County;

(2) in any county in which the violation occurred; or

(3) in the county in which the victim resides, regardless of whether the alleged violator has resided, worked, or done business in the county in which the victim resides.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1326, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Assigned by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER E. SECURITY FREEZE FOR CHILD

Sec. 20.21. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Protected consumer" means an individual who resides in this state and is younger than 16 years of age at the time a request for the placement of a security freeze is made.

(2) "Record," with respect to a protected consumer, means a compilation of information identifying a protected consumer created by a consumer reporting agency solely to comply with this subchapter.

(3) "Representative" means a person who provides to a consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer.

(4) "Security freeze," with respect to a protected consumer, means:

(A) if a consumer reporting agency does not have a consumer file pertaining to the protected consumer, a restriction that:

(i) is placed on the protected consumer's record in accordance with this subchapter; and

(ii) prohibits a consumer reporting agency from releasing a consumer report relating to the extension of credit involving the consumer's record without the express authorization of the consumer's representative or the consumer, as applicable; or

(B) if a consumer reporting agency has a consumer file pertaining to the protected consumer, a restriction that:

(i) is placed on the protected consumer's consumer report in accordance with this subchapter; and

(ii) except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, prohibits a consumer reporting agency from releasing the protected consumer's consumer report relating to the extension of credit involving that consumer file, or any information derived from the protected consumer's consumer report.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.22. APPLICABILITY; CONFLICT OF LAW. (a) This subchapter does not apply to the use of a protected consumer's consumer report or record by:

(1) a person administering a credit file monitoring subscription service to which:

(A) the protected consumer has subscribed; or

(B) the representative of the protected consumer has subscribed on behalf of the protected consumer;

(2) a person providing the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative with a copy of the protected consumer's consumer report on request of the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative;

(3) a consumer reporting agency with respect to a database or file that consists entirely of information concerning, and is used solely for, one or more of the following:

(A) criminal history record information;

(B) personal loss history information;

(C) fraud prevention or detection;

(D) tenant screening; or

(E) employment screening; or

(4) an entity described by Section 20.038(11), (12), or (13).

(b) To the extent of a conflict between a provision of this subchapter relating to a protected consumer and another provision of this chapter, this subchapter controls.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.23. PROOF OF AUTHORITY AND IDENTIFICATION. (a) Documentation that shows a person has authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer is considered sufficient proof of authority for purposes of this subchapter, including:

(1) an order issued by a court; or

(2) a written, notarized statement signed by a representative that expressly describes the authority of the representative to act on behalf of a protected consumer.

(b) Information or documentation that identifies a protected consumer or a representative of a protected consumer is considered sufficient proof of identity for purposes of this subchapter, including:

(1) a social security number or a copy of the social security card issued by the United States Social Security Administration;

(2) a certified or official copy of a birth certificate issued by the entity authorized to issue the birth certificate;

(3) a copy of a driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety; or

(4) any other government-issued identification.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.24. USE OF RECORD TO CONSIDER CREDITWORTHINESS OR FOR OTHER PURPOSES PROHIBITED. A protected consumer's record may not be created or used to consider the protected consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living for any purpose described by Section 20.01(4).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.25. REQUEST TO PLACE A SECURITY FREEZE; CREATION OF RECORD. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer file if:

(1) the consumer reporting agency receives a request from the protected consumer's representative for the placement of the security freeze as provided by this section; and

(2) the protected consumer's representative:

(A) submits the request to the consumer reporting agency at the address or other point of contact of and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency;

(B) provides to the consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer and the representative;

(C) provides to the consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer; and

(D) pays to the consumer reporting agency a fee as provided by Section 20.29.

(b) If a consumer reporting agency does not have a consumer file pertaining to a protected consumer when the consumer reporting agency receives a request under Subsection (a) and if the requirements of Subsection (a) are met, the consumer reporting agency shall create a record for the protected consumer and place a security freeze on the protected consumer's record.

(c) The consumer reporting agency shall place the security freeze on the protected consumer's consumer file or record, as applicable, not later than the 30th day after receiving a request that meets the requirements of Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.26. RELEASE OF CONSUMER REPORT PROHIBITED. Unless a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer file or record is removed under Section 20.28 or 20.30, a consumer reporting agency may not release any consumer report relating to the protected consumer, any information derived from the protected consumer's consumer report, or any record created for the protected consumer.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.27. PERIOD OF SECURITY FREEZE. A security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer file or record remains in effect until:

(1) the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative requests that the consumer reporting agency remove the security freeze in accordance with Section 20.28; or

(2) a consumer reporting agency removes the security freeze under Section 20.30.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.28. REMOVAL OF SECURITY FREEZE. (a) A protected consumer or a protected consumer's representative may remove a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer file or record if the protected consumer or representative:

(1) submits a request for the removal of the security freeze to the consumer reporting agency at the address or other point of contact of and in the manner specified by the consumer reporting agency;

(2) provides to the consumer reporting agency:

(A) in the case of a request by the protected consumer:

(i) sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer; and

(ii) proof that the sufficient proof of authority for the protected consumer's representative to act on behalf of the protected consumer is no longer valid; or

(B) in the case of a request by the representative of a protected consumer:

(i) sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer and the representative; and

(ii) sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer; and

(3) pays to the consumer reporting agency a fee as provided by Section 20.29.

(b) The consumer reporting agency shall remove the security freeze on the protected consumer's consumer file or record not later than the 30th day after the date the agency receives a request that meets the requirements of Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.29. FEES. (a) A consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for any service performed under this subchapter other than a fee authorized by this section.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a consumer reporting agency may charge a reasonable fee in an amount not to exceed $10 for each placement or removal of a security freeze on the protected consumer's consumer file or record.

(c) A consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for the placement of a security freeze under this subchapter if:

(1) the protected consumer's representative submits to the consumer reporting agency a copy of a valid police report, investigative report, or complaint involving the commission of an offense under Section 32.51, Penal Code; or

(2) at the time the protected consumer's representative makes the request for a security freeze:

(A) the protected consumer is under the age of 16; and

(B) the consumer reporting agency has created a consumer report pertaining to the protected consumer.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.30. EFFECT OF MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION OF FACT. A consumer reporting agency may remove a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer file or record, or delete a record of a protected consumer, if the security freeze was placed or the record was created based on a material misrepresentation of fact by the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 20.31. REMEDY FOR VIOLATION. Notwithstanding Subchapter D or any other law, the exclusive remedy for a violation of this subchapter is a suit filed by the attorney general under Section 20.11.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 64 (S.B. 60), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.